Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1724
Sheriff's office merit commission; members; salary; expenses.

The members of the commission shall not receive a salary for their services but shall be reimbursed for such necessary expenses and mileage as may be incurred in the actual performance of their duties with reimbursement for mileage to be made at the rate provided in section 81-1176.

Laws 1969, c. 140, § 4, p. 643;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 29;

Laws 1996, LB 1011, § 12.